Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7,104
Coverage for orally
administered anticancer medication; requirements; applicability.

(1) Notwithstanding section 44-3,131, (a) any individual or
group sickness and accident insurance policy, certificate, or subscriber contract
delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state and any hospital,
medical, or surgical expense-incurred policy, except for policies that provide
coverage for a specified disease or other limited-benefit coverage, and (b)
any self-funded employee benefit plan to the extent not preempted by federal
law that provides coverage for cancer treatment shall provide coverage for
a prescribed, orally administered anticancer medication that is used to kill
or slow the growth of cancerous cells on a basis no less favorable than intravenously
administered or injected anticancer medications that are covered as medical
benefits by the policy, certificate, contract, or plan.

(2) This section does not prohibit such policy, certificate,
contract, or plan from requiring prior authorization for a prescribed, orally
administered anticancer medication. If such medication is authorized, the
cost to the covered individual shall not exceed the coinsurance or copayment
that would be applied to any other cancer treatment involving intravenously
administered or injected anticancer medications.

(3) A policy, certificate, contract, or plan provider shall
not reclassify any anticancer medication or increase a coinsurance, copayment,
deductible, or other out-of-pocket expense imposed on any anticancer medication
to achieve compliance with this section. Any change that otherwise increases
an out-of-pocket expense applied to any anticancer medication shall also be
applied to the majority of comparable medical or pharmaceutical benefits under
the policy, certificate, contract, or plan.

(4) This section does not prohibit a policy, certificate,
contract, or plan provider from increasing cost-sharing for all benefits,
including cancer treatments.

(5) This section shall apply to any policy, certificate, contract,
or plan that is delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state on
or after October 1, 2012.

Laws 2012, LB882, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB254, § 1.